Idaho, session 2026, S1241.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 35, Title 25, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 25-3514B, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
25-3514B. PROTECTION OF WORKING ANIMALS. (1) The right to utilize
working animals for the mutual benefit and welfare of working animals and the
person or enterprise that the working animals serve shall be guaranteed. No
county, municipality, state agency, or political subdivision shall enact
or enforce any ordinance, regulation, or rule that is more restrictive than
state law or that terminates, bans, effectively bans, or creates undue fi-
nancial hardship for, on-the-job use of working animals or a working animal
enterprise.
(2) For purposes of this section, "working animal" means any animal
used for the purpose of performing a specific duty or function in commerce
or service. Such term includes animals involved in hunting, entertainment,
equine riding and carriage driving, transportation, education, exhibi-
tion, agritourism, ranching, livestock guardianship or herding, farming,
logging, or other service or activity that has traditionally involved the
utilization of working animals.
(3) This section shall not:
(a) Apply to cockfighting or dogfighting as provided for in sections
25-3506 and 25-3507, Idaho Code; or
(b) Prevent the enactment and enforcement of:
(i) A zoning ordinance properly adopted pursuant to chapter 65,
title 67, Idaho Code;
(ii) An animal care law or regulation adopted pursuant to this
chapter; or
(iii) An ordinance concerning public health or public safety prop-
erly adopted pursuant to Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.